California statutes. Education Code
-------------------------------------------

44372.

The powers and duties of the commission regarding the accreditation system shall include the following:

(a) Adopt and implement an accreditation framework, which sets forth the policies of the commission regarding the accreditation of educator preparation in California.

(b) Establish and modify credential-specific standards, experimental program standards, and alternative program standards, as defined in the adopted accreditation framework.

(c) Rule on the eligibility of an applicant for accreditation when the applying institution has not previously prepared educators for state
 certification in California, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 44227.

(d) Appoint and reappoint the members of the Committee on Accreditation, in accordance with Section 44373, by selecting among nominees submitted by a panel of distinguished educators.

(e) Review periodic accreditation reports by the Committee on Accreditation, and refer accreditation issues and concerns to the committee for its examination and response.

(f) Hear and resolve appeals of accreditation decisions, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 44374.

(g) Allocate resources annually for implementation of the accreditation system.

(h) With the Committee on Accreditation, jointly design an evaluation of
 accreditation policies and their implementation.

(i) Inform and advise the Legislature regarding statutory issues related to accreditation, and submit legislative recommendations, after considering the advice of the Committee on Accreditation, educational institutions, and professional organizations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 348, Sec. 8.   (SB 941)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

44373.

(a) There is hereby established the Committee on Accreditation consisting of 12 members selected for their distinguished records of accomplishment in education. Six members shall be from postsecondary education institutions, and six shall be certificated professionals in public schools, school districts, or county offices of education in California. No member shall serve on the committee as a representative of any organization or institution. Membership shall be, to the maximum extent possible, balanced in terms of ethnicity, gender, and geographic regions. The committee shall include members from elementary and secondary schools, and members from public and private institutions of postsecondary education.

(b) The terms of committee members shall be in accordance with the accreditation framework. Appointment of the initial committee members shall be from nominees submitted by a panel of distinguished educators, who are named by a consensus of the commission and the accreditation advisory council, pursuant to Section 44371, as that section read on December 31, 1993. Appointment of subsequent committee members shall be from nominees submitted by a distinguished panel named by a consensus of the commission and the Committee on Accreditation. For each committee position to be filled by the commission, the panel shall submit two highly qualified nominees.

(c) The committee shall do, but shall not be limited to doing, all of the following:

(1) Make decisions about the accreditation of educator preparation. The committee’s decisionmaking process shall be in accordance with the accreditation framework.

(2) Make decisions about the initial accreditation of new programs of educator preparation in accordance with procedures established by the committee.

(3) Determine the comparability of standards submitted by applicants with those adopted by the commission, in accordance with the accreditation framework.

(4) Adopt guidelines for accreditation reviews, and monitor the performance of accreditation teams and other aspects of the accreditation system.

(5) Present an annual accreditation report to the commission and respond to accreditation issues and concerns referred to the committee by the commission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 426, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44374.

(a) The accreditation framework shall include common standards that relate to aspects of program quality that are the same for all credential programs. The framework shall also include multiple options for program standards.

(b) The accreditation framework shall include provisions regarding well-trained accreditation teams whose members shall be drawn from a pool of California college and university faculty members and administrators, elementary and secondary school teachers and other certificated professionals, and local school board members. For each accreditation visit there shall be one team, whose size, composition, and expertise shall be constituted according to the accreditation framework.

(c) An accreditation team shall present its report and recommendations to the Committee on Accreditation in accordance with the accreditation framework. The committee shall consider the accreditation team report and recommendations, and shall also consider evidence, which may be submitted by the institution, that the team demonstrated bias or acted arbitrarily or capriciously or contrary to the policies of the accreditation framework or the procedural guidelines of the committee.

(d) The Committee on Accreditation shall make a single decision to accredit, to accredit with stipulations, or to deny accreditation to an institution’s credential programs, pursuant to Section 44373 and the accreditation framework.

(e) An institution has the right to appeal to the commission if the procedures or decisions of an accreditation team or the Committee on Accreditation are arbitrary, capricious, unfair, or contrary to the policies of the commission or the procedural guidelines of the committee. An institution also has the right to recommend changes in the accreditation policies of the commission, which shall be considered by the commission in consultation with the executive director and the Committee on Accreditation.

(f) At the request of an institution, the accreditation of an education unit or a specific program by a national accrediting body shall substitute for state accreditation provided that the national accrediting body has satisfied the applicable conditions set forth in the accreditation framework.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 426, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44374.5.

(a) The commission may charge fees to cover the standard costs of reviewing new and existing educator preparation programs. Sponsors of educator preparation programs shall submit the established fee to the commission when submitting a proposal for a new program, and, as determined by the commission, for the review of an existing program. The commission shall not waive the fee for the review of existing programs for in-kind contributions from sponsors of educator preparation programs. The commission may review the established fees on a periodic basis and adjust the fees as necessary. The commission shall notify the chairpersons of the committees and subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget and the Department of Finance at least 30 days before
 implementing the fees and at least 30 days before making any subsequent fee adjustments.

(b) The commission may charge commission-approved entities a fee to recover the costs of accreditation activities in excess of the regularly scheduled data reports, program assessments, and accreditation site visits. This includes, but is not necessarily limited to, accreditation revisits, addressing stipulations, or program assessment reviews beyond those supported within the standard costs of review. Sponsors of educator preparation programs shall submit the established fee to the commission in the year that the extraordinary activities are performed. The commission may review the established fee on a periodic basis, and adjust the fee as necessary. The commission shall notify the chairpersons of the committees and subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget and the Department of Finance at least 30 days before
 implementing the fee and at least 30 days before making any subsequent fee adjustments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 32, Sec. 29.   (SB 858)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Alternative Certification [44380. - 44387.]

44380.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the teaching profession must be able to recruit talented individuals, in addition to college students, from a variety of sources to address geographic and subject area shortages. Many persons changing careers and early retirees from industry and the military are interested in the challenge of teaching.

(b) The Legislature further finds that, in California, there is a serious shortage of qualified teachers in the subjects of mathematics and science, teachers who work with limited-English-proficient pupils, minority teachers, and special education teachers.

(c)Therefore, in enacting this article, the Legislature intends to encourage public school districts, county offices of education, and colleges and universities to design concentrated programs leading to a permanent credential for people with work experience and others who already have a bachelor’s degree.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 518, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44381.

As used in this article, “alternative certification program” is a program operated by a school district, county office of education, college or university, or other public education entity, individually or in collaboration with other public education entities in the region to be served, and designed to provide a concentrated program leading to a permanent teaching credential.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1147, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44382.

Alternative certification programs shall address geographic and subject matter shortage areas, and shall be targeted toward people with work experience and others who already have a bachelor’s degree in the field in which they plan to teach.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1147, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44383.

School districts or county offices of education operating, or that propose to operate, an alternative certification program pursuant to this article, may apply to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing for incentive grant funding that has been appropriated for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1147, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44384.

An alternative certification program that receives grant funding pursuant to this article shall be operated pursuant to either Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44325) of this chapter or Article 3 (commencing with Section 44450) of Chapter 3, or both. The commission shall encourage, and may provide funding to, programs that include innovative training, assessment, or support models and strategies that have the potential of improving the quality of the teaching force. The commission shall encourage collaboration among school districts in funding alternative certification programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1147, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44385.

The commission, with the assistance of representatives of classroom teachers, school administrators, parents, university and college educators, and others, as appropriate, shall establish criteria for selecting grant applicants to be funded. The criteria shall include the following:

(a) The demonstrated need for more fully prepared credentialed teachers, as defined in Section 44225.7, within each school district included in the application.

(b) The number of participants to be served and the number of credentialed teachers, with at least a preliminary or level 1 credential, at each schoolsite where interns will be assigned, including teachers serving as certificated staff mentors pursuant to Section 44560.

(c) The capacity of the school districts included in the application to provide mentoring support and assistance to intern teachers.

(d) The quality of the instruction, support, and assessment that will be available to interns, as evidenced by the response of the applicant to the commission’s standards of quality and effectiveness for preparation programs.

(e) The cost-effectiveness of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 518, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44386.

(a) From funds appropriated for the purposes of this article, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall award incentive grants to qualifying school districts or county offices of education. Each school district or county office of education that receives a grant shall provide matching funds from available sources in an amount equal to 50 percent of the cost of the alternative certification program. Grants shall be awarded by the commission for the remaining 50 percent of the cost of the alternative certification program, but in no event shall the grant amount awarded to a school district or county office of education exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per intern per year, except that the commission may require a lesser local contribution, or provide a larger grant per intern per year, in hardship cases.

(b) Participants in a district intern program conducted pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44325) or in an intern program conducted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 44450) of Chapter 3, who have received a preliminary credential and who are receiving funding for participating in an induction program pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 44279.1) are not eligible for funding under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 730, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

44387.

(a) From funds appropriated for purposes of this section, the commission may award increased funding, in addition to incentive grants awarded pursuant to Section 44386, to a school district or county office of education that agrees to enhance internship programs as provided in subdivision (b) and to address the distribution of teacher interns as required in subdivision (c).

(b) To qualify for increased intern program funding pursuant to this section, a school district or county office of education shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide teacher interns with the greater of (A) 120 hours of intensive preservice training focused on the teaching of English language learners, or (B) 40 hours of the preservice training in addition to all other required training, including, but not limited to, training required pursuant to Sections 44253.3, 44253.4, and 44253.10. The preservice training shall be completed before an intern teacher may provide instructional services.

(2) Provide all teacher interns with 40 hours of classroom observation, supervision, assistance, and assessment by one or more experienced teachers who possess valid certification to teach at the same grade level and the same subject matter and who are employed by the school district or county office of education, are assigned to assist the intern at the schoolsite, and, to the extent possible, are assigned to teach at the same schoolsite as the intern who is being assisted.

(3) Maintain a ratio of one experienced teacher to no more than five teacher interns at the same schoolsite.

(c) To continue to receive increased intern program funding pursuant to this section, commencing with the receipt of funding for a second year, a school district or county office of education shall show annually to the commission that no high-priority school, as described in Section 52055.605, will have a higher percentage of teacher interns than the districtwide average of teacher interns at a school in that year.

(d) Increased funding up to a total of three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per intern, per year, may be awarded by the commission to a school district or county office of education that meets the requirements of this section.

(e) Participants in an alternative certification program pursuant to this article, a district intern program conducted pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 44325), or an intern program conducted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 44450) of Chapter 3, who have received a preliminary credential and who are generating funding for participating in an induction program pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 44279.1) are eligible to generate enhanced funding under this section.

(f) When reporting to the Legislature and the Governor pursuant to Section 44225.6, the commission shall include the number of school districts and county offices of education receiving increased funding, and the number of interns for whom increased funding is claimed, pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 345, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. California School Paraprofessional Teacher Training Program [44391. - 44393.]

44391.

This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Classified School Employee Teacher Credentialing Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 29, Sec. 13.   (SB 828)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

44392.

For the purposes of this article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Applicant” means a school district, charter school, or county office of education applying for program funds under the California Classified School Employee Teacher Credentialing Program.

(b) “Institutions of higher education” means the California Community Colleges, the California State University, the University of California, and private not-for-profit institutions of higher education that offer a commission-approved teacher preparation program.

(c) “Participant” means a classified school employee who elects to participate in the California Classified School Employee Teacher Credentialing Program.

(d) “Program” means the California Classified School Employee Teacher Credentialing Program.

(e) “Classified school employee” means a noncertificated school employee currently working in a public school.

(f) “Teacher training program” means an undergraduate or graduate program of instruction conducted by a teacher preparation program approved by the commission that includes a developmentally sequenced career ladder to provide instruction, coursework, and clearly defined tasks for each level of the ladder, and that is designed to qualify students enrolled in the program for a teaching credential authorizing instruction in kindergarten and grades 1 to
 12, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 29, Sec. 14.   (SB 828)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

44393.

(a) The California Classified School Employee Teacher Credentialing Program is hereby established for the purpose of recruiting classified school employees to participate in a program designed to encourage them to enroll in teacher training programs and to provide instructional service as teachers in the public schools.

(b) Subject to an appropriation for these purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute, the commission shall issue a request for proposals to all school districts, charter schools, and county offices of education in the state in order to solicit applications for funding. The criteria adopted by the commission for the selection of school districts, charter
 schools, or county offices of education to participate in the program shall include all of the following:

(1) The extent to which the applicant demonstrates the capacity and willingness to accommodate the participation of classified school employees in teacher training programs conducted at institutions of higher education or a local educational agency.

(2) The extent to which the applicant’s plan for the implementation of its recruitment program involves the active participation of one or more local campuses of the participating institutions of higher education in the development of coursework and teaching programs for participating classified school employees. Each selected applicant shall be required to enter into a written articulation agreement with the participating campuses of
 the institutions of higher education.

(3) The extent to which the applicant’s plan for recruitment attempts to meet the demand for bilingual cross-cultural teachers and teachers in shortage areas in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(4) The extent to which a developmentally sequenced series of job descriptions leads from an entry-level classified school employee position to an entry-level teaching position in that school district, charter school, or county office of education.

(5) The extent to which the applicant’s plan for recruitment attempts to meet its own specific teacher needs.

(c) An applicant that is selected to
 participate pursuant to subdivision (b) shall provide information about the program to all eligible classified school employees in the school district, charter school, or county office of education and assistance to each classified school employee it recruits under the program regarding admission to a teacher training program.

(d) (1) An applicant shall require participants to satisfy both of the following requirements before participating in the program:

(A) Pass a criminal background check.

(B) Provide verification of one of the following:

(i) Has earned an associate or higher level degree.

(ii) Has successfully completed at least two years of study at a postsecondary educational institution.

(2) An applicant shall certify that it has received a commitment from each participant that he or she will accomplish all of the following:

(A) Graduate from an institution of higher education under the program with a bachelor’s degree.

(B) Complete all of the requirements for, and obtain, a multiple subject, single subject, or education specialist teaching credential.

(C) Complete one school year of classroom instruction in the school district, charter school, or county office of education for each year that he or she receives assistance for books, fees, and tuition
 while attending an institution of higher education under the program.

(e) The commission shall contract with an independent evaluator with a proven record of experience in assessing teacher training programs to conduct an evaluation to determine the success of the
 program. The evaluation shall be completed on or before July 1, 2021. The commission shall submit the completed evaluation to the Governor and the education policy and fiscal committees of the Assembly and Senate.

(f) On or before January 1 of each year, the commission shall report to the Legislature regarding the status of the program, including, but not limited to, the number of classified school employees recruited, the academic progress of the classified school employees recruited, the number of classified school employees recruited who are subsequently employed as teachers in the public schools, the degree to which the applicant meets the teacher shortage needs of the school district, charter school, or county office of education, and the ethnic and racial composition of the participants in the program. The report shall
 be made in conformance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 319, Sec. 1.   (AB 1624)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. National Board for Professional Teaching Standards Certification Incentive Program [44395. - 44399.1.]

44395.

(a) (1) The National Board for Professional Teaching Standards Certification Incentive Program is hereby established to award grants to school districts for the purpose of providing awards to teachers who are employed by school districts or charter schools, are assigned to teach in California public schools, and have attained or will attain certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards. Awards shall be granted to the extent that funds have been appropriated for this purpose in the annual Budget Act.

(2) (A) Commencing July 1, 2021, any teacher who has attained certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards is eligible to receive an award of up to twenty-five
 thousand dollars ($25,000) if the teacher agrees to teach at a high-priority school for at least five years. Teaching service before July 1, 2021, may not be counted towards satisfaction of this five-year commitment.

(B) Awards granted pursuant to this paragraph shall be disbursed in annual payments of five thousand dollars ($5,000) over a five-year period. The annual payment shall be made upon completion of the school year, and upon approval of a district-certified application pursuant to the guidelines of subdivision (c) of Section 44396.

(C) An award recipient’s service shall be at a high-priority school listed on the most recent list of priority schools published by the department that is available when the grant recipient applies for a National Board for Professional Teaching Standards
 Certification Incentive Program grant award pursuant to this paragraph. Further service at that school shall continue to satisfy the service requirements of this paragraph even if the school is no longer listed on a future priority school list published by the department.

(3) (A) Commencing July 1, 2021, any teacher who initiates the process of pursuing a certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards when teaching at a high-priority school is eligible to receive an award of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(B) Awards granted pursuant to this paragraph shall be disbursed from the department to the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards. Any unused funds shall be applied to future candidates.

(C) A teacher who receives an
 award pursuant to this paragraph may still apply to receive funds under paragraphs (2) and (4) after completion of a certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards to the extent funds are available.

(4) (A) (i) Commencing July 1, 2023, any teacher who initiates the process of maintenance of certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards when teaching at a high-priority school is eligible to receive an award of four hundred ninety-five dollars ($495).

(ii) Awards granted pursuant to this paragraph shall be disbursed from the department to the National Board for Professional Teaching
 Standards. Any unused funds shall be applied to future candidates.

(iii) A teacher who receives an award pursuant to this paragraph may still apply to receive funds under paragraph (2).

(iv) A teacher may apply for an award pursuant to this paragraph every time they begin the process of maintenance of certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards. Teachers who apply for an award pursuant to this paragraph shall be teaching at a priority school at the time of application.

(B) This paragraph may be implemented using funds appropriated pursuant to Section 137 of Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021.

(b) (1) The department shall administer the awards authorized by subdivision (a), and shall develop, in consultation with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, certification and award information, criteria, procedures, and applications, all of which shall be submitted to the state board for approval. Amendments requested by the state board to that information, criteria, procedures, and applications shall be made before the dissemination of the material and the granting of any award under this article.

(2) Commencing July 1, 2027, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall administer the awards authorized by this section and any reference to department shall instead refer to the commission.

(c) The department shall distribute the materials described in subdivision (b) to school districts. Each school district is strongly encouraged to ensure that teachers employed by
 the district or by charter schools affiliated with the district are informed about the program and can acquire the necessary application and information materials.

(d) School districts are encouraged to provide for adequate release time and support for a teacher to complete the certification process. As a condition to providing that release time and support, a school district may require that a teacher serve in a mentor teacher capacity.

(e) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “School district” means school district, county board of education, county superintendent of schools, a state operated program, including a special school, a regional occupational center or program operated by a joint powers authority or a county office of education, or an education program providing instruction
 in transitional kindergarten, kindergarten, or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, that is offered by a state agency, including the Department of Youth and Community Restoration and the State Department of Developmental Services.

(2) “High-priority school” means a school with 55 percent or more of its pupils being unduplicated pupils, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02. This designation shall be determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 65.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44395.5.

For the purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44395, “assigned to teach” as used in subdivision (a) of that section may include, but is not limited to, a teacher leadership role as a peer assistance and review coach, mentor, or other teacher support provider if the position does not require an administrative credential. In order to be eligible for an award pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44395, a teacher shall be assigned to teach for at least 50 percent of a full-time position.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 734, Sec. 25.   Effective October 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

44396.

(a) (1) To the extent that funds are available for that purpose, a teacher who meets the criteria approved by the state board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44395 is eligible and may apply for an award by following the procedures and instructions developed pursuant to that subdivision.

(2) A teacher who attained certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards before January 1, 2021, and who was employed by a school district or charter school and assigned to teach in a California public school on the date of certification may apply for an award authorized pursuant to this article if the teacher meets all the other requirements for that award specified by this article. For awards pursuant to this subdivision, teaching service before July 1, 2021, may not be counted toward satisfaction of the teacher’s five-year agreement to teach in a high-priority school.

(b) Teachers shall submit their applications for an award authorized by this article to the school district employing them. Teachers employed by a charter school shall submit their application through the school district granting the school’s charter.

(c) The department shall approve applications submitted by school districts that meet the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44395. To the extent funds are available, the department shall apportion funds to the appropriate school districts in the amount of the award authorized by Section 44395 for each approved application. The school district shall use funds apportioned to it
 pursuant to this subdivision to provide the amount of the award authorized by subdivision (a) of Section 44395 to each teacher whose application is approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 43.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

44398.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law except Sections 44332.6, 44340, 44346.1, and 44830.1, a person who is licensed to teach or provide services in the public schools of a state other than California and who is certified by the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards shall be issued a clear teaching or services credential authorizing teaching or service in the area, as determined by the commission, in which the person has received national certification.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede the requirements of Section 44253.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 316, Sec. 7.   (AB 239)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44399.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, except Sections 44332.6, 44340, 44346.1, and 44830.1, the commission shall issue a clear credential to the holder of a preliminary teaching or services credential who attains certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards. The clear credential issued pursuant to this section shall authorize the holder to teach or provide services in the area that the commission determines is equivalent to the certificate field in which the teacher or services provider received certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 316, Sec. 8.   (AB 239)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

44399.1.

(a) The commission shall issue an authorization for an additional subject or for a new teaching credential type to the holder of a valid California multiple subject or single subject teaching credential, or eligible applicant, who has earned certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards in the additional single subject content area or the new multiple subject or single subject teaching credential type.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when there is no direct equivalence between the national certification and the California subject or credential type, the commission shall determine the subject or credential type or may require the applicant to qualify for a commission-approved determination of subject matter competence before issuance of the credential or authorization request. An applicant for a multiple subject teaching credential may also be required to qualify for a commission-approved determination of subject matter competence in order to comply with state subject matter requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 44.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13.5. Educator Recruitment and Retention Initiative [44400. - 44400.03.]

44400.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “High-need field” means a field designated as having the most significant shortages by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing and may include any of the following:

(1) Credentials issued in conjunction with a bilingual or computer science authorization.

(2) Mathematics, science, or technology
 credentials.

(3) Special education credentials.

(b) “Local educational agency” means a school district, charter school, or county office of education.

(c) “Priority school” means a school with 55 percent or more of its pupils being unduplicated pupils, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02.

(d) “Program” means the Student Teacher Stipend Program established pursuant to Section 44400.01.

(e) “Prospective educator” means a candidate enrolled in a program of professional preparation for a preliminary multiple subject, single subject, education specialist, or PK-3 early childhood education specialist instruction credential accredited by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(f) “Student teaching” shall align to clinical practice guidance by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, and refers to time spent in the classroom with a cooperating or mentor teacher, and includes, but is not limited to, coplanning, coteaching, guided teaching, and solo teaching. For the purposes of this program, service on an intern credential does not qualify as student teaching.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 66.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44400.01.

(a) The Student Teacher Stipend Program is hereby established to support prospective educators during their completion of 500 or more hours of student teaching as part of their credential program’s clinical practice and to provide additional support, through enhanced stipend awards authorized pursuant to this article, to prospective educators who commit to serve in a high-need field.

(b) (1) To improve both teacher retention and recruitment in California’s public school system, it is the intent of the Legislature to create a grant program
 to compensate student teachers, support credential attainment via clinically rich credential pathways, and support the prospective educator’s successful transition into local educational agency employment.

(2) It is further the intent of the Legislature to authorize the Student Teacher Stipend Program as an ongoing, annual program to support the recruitment and retention of prospective educators.

(3) It is further the intent of the Legislature to increase stipend amounts available, pursuant to this article, for prospective educators who commit to teaching in a priority school or high need field, in future years, subject to an appropriation for this purpose.

(c) Funding shall be provided under this article to the extent that funds have been appropriated for this purpose in the annual Budget Act or another
 statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 67.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44400.02.

(a) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall award funding appropriated for this purpose to local educational agencies that host student teachers or teacher residents or that employ teacher apprentices.

(b) (1) Local educational agencies awarded funding pursuant to this article shall provide stipends to prospective educators during their completion of 500 or more hours of student teaching. Stipends for each prospective educator shall be ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and paid during the school year in which the credential applicants are completing their student teaching.

(2) Local educational agencies employing credentialed educator apprentices may use stipend awards
 to offset the wages paid to those apprentices during the initial phase of the apprenticeship when the apprentice is not yet the educator of record.

(3) Local educational agencies hosting teacher residents may use student teacher stipends in cases where residents are not supported by residency stipends pursuant to Section 44415.5.

(4) Commencing July 1, 2027, local educational agencies awarded funding pursuant to this article shall, consistent with subdivision (d), provide an additional stipend of five thousand dollars ($5,000) to prospective educators pursuing a credential and student teaching in a high-need field.
